Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20203-111
Rules and regulations; where kept.

The division shall keep on file with the Secretary of State and at the principal office of the division a copy of all its rules and regulations for public inspection.

Laws 1945, c. 5, § 6(5), p. 84;

Laws 1976, LB 460, § 4;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 11.